Maryland, session 2026, SB0338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 768 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) The State Retirement Agency shall convene a workgroup of interested
stakeholders to study the requirements and processes for transfers of member service
between State and local retirement and pension systems and make recommendations to
improve the process of transfers between systems.
(d) On or before [December 1, 2025] OCTOBER 1, 2026, the State Retirement
Agency shall submit a report of the findings and recommendations of the workgroup,
– 1 –

Ch. 293 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
including the need for any legislative initiatives, to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the [General Assembly] SENATE BUDGET AND
TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE
JOINT COMMITTEE ON PENSIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of [1 year] 2 YEARS and 1 month and, at the
end of June 30, [2026] 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 769 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) The State Retirement Agency shall convene a workgroup of interested
stakeholders to study the requirements and processes for transfers of member service
between State and local retirement and pension systems and make recommendations to
improve the process of transfers between systems.
(d) On or before [December 1, 2025] OCTOBER 1, 2026, the State Retirement
Agency shall submit a report of the findings and recommendations of the workgroup,
including the need for any legislative initiatives, to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the [General Assembly] SENATE BUDGET AND
TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE
JOINT COMMITTEE ON PENSIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of [1 year] 2 YEARS and 1 month and, at the
end of June 30, [2026] 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –